District of Columbia statutes.
47-1053

DC Teachers Federal Credit Union; lot 809, square 938.

(a)

The real estate taxes on the nonprofit real property of the DC Teachers Federal Credit Union, including any interest, penalties, fees, fines, and other related charges assessed against the DC Teachers Federal Credit Union, on real property located 903 D Street, N.E., lot 809, square 938, shall be subject to a full or partial tax exemption for the portion of the real property which is used for the nonprofit activities of DC Teachers Federal Credit Union.

(b)

Pursuant to § 47-1002, this section shall apply only to a District of Columbia sponsored, federally-chartered, credit union which has its place of business located in a current or former District of Columbia-owned property.

History

Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-253, § 2, 50 DCR 229